Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-901
Act, how cited.

Sections 23-901 to 23-920 shall be known and may be cited as the County Budget Act of 1937.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 1, p. 224;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2101;

R.S.1943, § 23-901;

Laws 1945, c. 45, § 1, p. 212.

Preparation of general county budget is outlined in this and following sections. State ex rel. Agricultural Extension Service v. Miller, 182 Neb. 285, 154 N.W.2d 469 (1967).